Vermont statutes. Title 27A Vermont Common Interest Ownership Act (1994)
Article 4. Protection of Purchasers

§ 4-101.
Waiver.

This article applies to all units subject to this title, except as provided in subsection (b) of this section or as modified or waived by agreement of purchasers of units in a common interest community in which all units are restricted to nonresidential use.

Neither a public offering statement nor a resale certificate need be prepared or delivered in the case of:

a gratuitous disposition of a unit;

a disposition pursuant to court order;

a disposition by a government or governmental agency;

a disposition by foreclosure or deed in lieu of foreclosure;

a disposition to a dealer;

a disposition that may be canceled at any time and for any reason by the purchaser without penalty;

a disposition of a unit restricted to nonresidential purposes.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

In the case of commercial and industrial common interest communities, the purchaser is often more sophisticated than the purchaser of residential units and thus better able to bargain for the protections he believes necessary. While this may not always be true, no objective test can be developed which easily distinguishes those commercial purchasers who are able to protect themselves from those who, in the ordinary course of business, have not developed such sophistication. At the same time, the cost of protection imposed by Article 4 may be substantial. Accordingly, subsection (a) permits waiver or modification of Article 4 protections in common interest communities where all units are restricted to non-residential use. However, except for certain waivers of implied warranties of quality (see Section 4-115) and certain exemptions from public offering statement and resale certificate requirements (see subsection (b)), no express waiver of the protections of this article with respect to the purchasers of residential units is permitted by this subsection. Accordingly, by operation of Section 1-104, the rights provided by this article may not be waived in the case of residential purchasers. Moreover, because of the interrelated rights of residential and commercial owners in mixed-use common interest communities, waiver or modification of rights conferred by this article is restricted to purchasers in wholly non-residential common interest communities.

The 1994 amendment changed subsection (b)(7). The rationale for the change is contained in the revised Comment to Section 1-203.

§ 4-102.
Liability for public offering statement requirements.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, a declarant shall prepare a public offering statement conforming to the requirements of sections 4-103, 4-104, 4-105, and 4-106 of this title before offering any interest in a unit to the public.

A declarant may transfer responsibility for preparation of all or a part of the public offering statement to a successor declarant or to a dealer who intends to offer units in the common interest community. In the event of any such transfer, the transferor shall provide the transferee with any information necessary to enable the transferee to fulfill the requirements of subsection (a) of this section.

Any declarant or dealer who offers a unit to a purchaser shall deliver a public offering statement in the manner prescribed in subsection 4-103(a) of this title. The declarant who prepared all or a part of the public offering statement is liable under section 4-117 of this title for any false or misleading statement stated in it or for any omission of material fact therefrom.

If a unit is part of a common interest community and is part of any other real estate regime in connection with the sale of which the delivery of a public offering statement is required under the laws of this state, a single public offering statement conforming to the requirements of sections 4-103, 4-104, 4-105, and 4-106 of this title, as they relate to each regime in which the unit is located, and to any other requirements imposed by law may be prepared and delivered in lieu of providing two or more public offering statements.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999; amended

2009, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 43, eff. Jan. 1, 2012.

§ 4-103.
Public offering statement; general provisions.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, a public offering statement shall contain or fully and accurately disclose all the following:

The name and principal address of the declarant and of the common interest community, and a statement that the common interest community is either a condominium or planned community.

A general description of the common interest community, including to the extent known, the types, number, and declarant’s schedule of commencement and completion of construction of buildings, and amenities that the declarant anticipates including in the common interest community.

The number of units in the common interest community.

Copies and a brief narrative description of the significant features of the declaration, other than any plats and plans, and any other recorded covenants, conditions, restrictions, and reservations affecting the common interest community; the bylaws and any rules or regulations of the association; copies of any contracts and leases to be signed by purchasers at closing; and a brief narrative description of any contracts or leases that will or may be subject to cancellation by the association or managing entity under section 3-105 of this title.

The financial information required by subsection (d) of this section.

Any services not reflected in the budget that the declarant provides, or expenses that the declarant pays, and that the declarant expects may become a common expense of the association and the projected common expense assessment attributable to each of those services or expenses for the association and for each type of unit.

Any initial or special fee due from the purchaser or seller at the time of sale and a description of the purpose and method of calculating the fee.

A description of any liens, defects or encumbrances on or affecting the title to the common interest community.

A description of any financing offered or arranged by the declarant.

The terms and significant limitations of any warranties provided by the declarant, including statutory warranties and limitations on the enforcement thereof or on damages.

A statement of any unsatisfied judgments or pending suits against the association and the status of any pending suits material to the common interest community of which a declarant has actual knowledge.

Any restraints on alienation of any portion of the common interest community and any restrictions:

on use, occupancy, and alienation of the units, and

on the amount for which a unit may be sold or on the amount that may be received by a unit owner on sale, condemnation, or casualty loss to the unit or to the common interest community, or on termination of the common interest community.

A description of the insurance coverage provided for the benefit of unit owners.

Any current or expected fees or charges to be paid by unit owners for the use of the common elements and other facilities related to the common interest community.

The extent to which financial arrangements have been provided for completion of all improvements which the declarant is obligated to build pursuant to section 4-119 of this title.

A brief narrative description of any zoning and other land use requirements affecting the common interest community.

All unusual and material circumstances, features, and characteristics of the common interest community and the units.

A description of any arrangement described in section 1-209 of this title that binds the association.

If a common interest community composed of not more than four units is not subject to any development rights and no power is reserved to a declarant to make the common interest community part of a larger common interest community, group of common interest communities or other real estate, a public offering statement need not include the information otherwise required by subdivisions (a)(4), (9), (10), (15), (16), and (17) of this section.

A declarant shall promptly amend the public offering statement to report any material change in the information required by this section.

The public offering statement must contain any current balance sheet and a projected budget for the association, either within or as an exhibit to the public offering statement, for one year after the date of the first conveyance to a purchaser, and thereafter the current budget of the association, a statement of who prepared the budget, and a statement of the budget’s assumptions concerning occupancy and inflation factors. The budget must include:

a statement of the amount, or a statement that there is no amount, included in the budget as a reserve for repairs and replacement;

a statement of any other reserves;

the projected common expense assessment by category of expenditures for the association; and

the projected monthly common expense assessment for each type of unit.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999; amended

2009, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 44, eff. Jan. 1, 2012.

§ 4-104.
Common interest communities subject to development rights.

If the declaration provides that a common interest community is subject to any development rights, the public offering statement shall disclose, in addition to the information required by section 4-103 of this title:

the maximum number of units, and the maximum number of units per acre, that may be created;

how many or what percentage of the units that may be created will be restricted exclusively to residential use, or a statement that no representations are made regarding use restrictions;

if any of the units that may be built within real estate subject to development rights are not to be restricted exclusively to residential use, a statement, with respect to each portion of that real estate, of the maximum percentage of the real estate areas and the maximum percentage of the floor areas of all units that may be created therein, that are not restricted exclusively to residential use;

a brief narrative description of any development rights reserved by a declarant and of any conditions or limitations upon the exercise of development rights;

the maximum extent to which each unit’s allocated interest may be changed by the exercise of any development right described in subdivision (3) of this section;

the extent to which any buildings or other improvements that may be erected pursuant to any development right in any part of the common interest community will be compatible with existing buildings and improvements in the common interest community in terms of architectural style, quality of construction and size, or a statement that no assurances are made regarding compatibility;

description of all other improvements that may be made and limited common elements that may be created within any part of the common interest community pursuant to any development right reserved by the declarant, or a statement that no assurances are made in that regard;

limitations on the location of any building or other improvement that may be made within any part of the common interest community pursuant to any development right reserved by the declarant, or a statement that no assurances are made in that regard;

a statement that any limited common elements created pursuant to any development right reserved by the declarant will be of the same general types and sizes as the limited common elements within other parts of the common interest community, or a statement of the types and sizes planned, or a statement that no assurances are made in that regard;

a statement that the proportion of limited common elements to units created pursuant to any development right reserved by the declarant will be approximately equal to the proportion existing within other parts of the common interest community, or a statement of any other assurances in that regard, or a statement that no assurances are made in that regard; and

the extent to which any assurances made pursuant to this section apply or do not apply in the event that any development right is not exercised by the declarant.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This section requires disclosure in the public offering statement of the manner in which the declarant’s exercise of development rights may affect purchasers who acquire units before those rights have been fully exercised.
The purpose is to put the purchaser on notice of the extent to which the exercise of those rights may alter, sometimes quite dramatically, both the physical and the legal aspects of the project.
For example, the prospective purchaser may be contemplating the acquisition of a particular unit because it enjoys a view of open, undeveloped land over which the declarant has, however, reserved development rights.
It may be that the boundary of the parcel as to which development rights have been reserved actually coincides with, or runs quite close to, the outer wall of the unit in question.
The disclosures or statements made pursuant to paragraphs (8) and (12) of this section will indicate to the prospective purchaser the extent (if any) to which he can rely on the declarant not to do anything which would radically alter the view from the unit.

§ 4-105.
Time shares.

If the declaration provides that ownership or occupancy of any unit is or may be in time shares, the public offering statement shall disclose in addition to the information required by section 4-103 of this title:

the number and identity of units in which time shares may be created;

the total number of time shares that may be created;

the minimum duration of any time share that may be created; and

the extent to which the creation of time shares may affect the enforceability of the association’s lien for assessments provided in section 3-116 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

Time sharing has become increasingly important in recent years, particularly with respect to resort common interest communities. In recognition of this fact, this section requires the disclosure of certain information with respect to time sharing.

Virtually all existing state statutes dealing with condominiums, planned communities, or cooperatives are silent with respect to time-share ownership. The inclusion of disclosure provisions for certain forms of time sharing in this Act, however, does not imply that other law regulating time sharing is affected in any way in a State merely because that State enacts this Act.

The Uniform Law Commissioners’ Model Real Estate Time-Share Act specifies more extensive disclosures for time-share properties.
A “time-share property” may include part or all of the common interest community, and Section 1-109 of the Model Act governs conflicts between this Act and time-share legislation.

§ 4-106.
Conversion buildings.

The public offering statement of a common interest community containing any conversion building which may be occupied for residential use shall contain, in addition to the information required by section 4-103 of this title:

a statement by the declarant, based on a report by an independent architect or engineer, describing the present condition of all structural components and mechanical and electrical installations material to the use and enjoyment of the building;

a statement by the declarant of the expected useful life of each item reported in subdivision (1) of this section, or a statement that no representations are made in that regard; and

a list of any outstanding notices of uncured violation of the building code or other municipal regulations and the cost of curing those violations.

This section applies to any buildings containing units that may be occupied for residential use.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

In the case of a common interest community containing one or more conversion buildings, the disclosure of additional information relating to the condition of those buildings is required in the public offering statement because of the difficulty inherent in a single purchaser attempting to determine the condition of what is likely to be an older building being renovated for the purpose of common interest community sales.

Paragraph (a)(1) requires the person who gives the public offering statement to retain an independent architect or engineer to report on the present condition of all structural components and fixed mechanical and electrical installations in the conversion building. Such information is as useful to declarant as to the purchaser since, under the implied warranty provisions of Section 4-114, a declarant impliedly warrants all improvements made by any person to the building “before creation of the common interest community” unless such improvements are specifically excluded from the implied warranty of quality pursuant to Section 4-115(b).

See Comment 6 to Section 2-101 concerning the meaning of “structural components” as used in paragraph (a)(1). Any material changes in the “present condition” of these systems must be reported by an amendment to the public offering statement.

Under paragraph (a)(3), the person required to give the public offering statement is required to provide purchasers with a list of all outstanding notices of uncured violations of building codes or other municipal regulations. The literal wording of this provision does not require disclosure of known violations of such building codes or municipal regulations (at least violations having no effect upon the structural components or fixed mechanical and electrical installations of the planned community) unless actual ‘notices‘ of such violations have been received. To the extent that outstanding notices of uncured violations do exist, the cost of curing such violations would become a liability of the unit owners or the association following transfer of the unit to a purchaser. For that reason, the estimated cost of curing any outstanding violations must also be disclosed.

For the reasons set forth in the Comment to Section 4-101(a), this section does not apply to units which are restricted exclusively to non-residential use.

§ 4-107.
Common interest community securities.

If an interest in a common interest community is currently registered with the Securities and Exchange Commission of the United States, a declarant satisfies all requirements relating to the preparation of a public offering statement under this title if the declarant delivers to the purchaser a copy of the public offering statement filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. An interest in a common interest community is not a security under the provisions of 9 V.S.A. chapter 131.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

Some common interest communities will be regarded as “investment contracts” or other “securities” under federal law because they exhibit certain investment features such as mandatory rental pools. See SEC Securities Act Release No. 5347 (January 1973). The purpose of this section is to permit the declarant to file or deliver, in lieu of a public offering statement specifically prepared to comply with the provisions of this Act, the prospectus filed with and distributed pursuant to the regulations of the United States Securities and Exchange Commission. Absent this provision, prospective purchasers of common interest communities classified by the SEC as “securities” would have to be given two public offering statements, one prepared pursuant to this Act and the other prepared pursuant to the Securities Act of 1933. Not only would this result increase the declarant’s costs (and thus the price) of units, it might also reduce the likelihood of either public offering statement actually being read by prospective purchasers.

The bracketed language in the first sentence of this section should be inserted by States which choose to adopt the agency provisions of Article 5 of the Act. The second sentence should also be inserted by States opting to incorporate Article 5 of the Act to avoid duplicative regulation of common interest communities by the agency administering the State’s securities regulation statutes.

§ 4-108.
[Reserved.]

§ 4-109.
Resales of units.

Except in the case of a sale where delivery of a public offering statement is required or is exempt under subsection 4-101(b) of this title, a unit owner shall furnish to a purchaser before the conveyance or transfer of the right of possession of a unit, whichever is earlier, a copy of the declaration, without any plats and plans, the bylaws, the rules or regulations of the association and a certificate which discloses the following:

The effect on the proposed disposition of any right of first refusal or other restraint on the free alienability of the unit held by the association.

The amount of the periodic common expense assessment and any unpaid common expense or special assessment currently due and payable from or by the seller.

Any other fees payable by the owner of the unit being sold.

The amount of any reserves for capital expenditures and of any portions of those reserves designated by the association for any specified projects.

The most recent regularly prepared balance sheet and income and expense statement, if any, of the association.

The current operating budget of the association.

Any unsatisfied judgments against the association and the status of any pending suits in which the association is a defendant.

The amount of any insurance coverage provided for the benefit of unit owners.

Any alterations or improvements to the unit, or to the limited common elements assigned to it which violate any provision of the declaration within the knowledge of the executive board.

Any violations of the health or building codes with respect to the unit, the limited common elements assigned to it, or any other portion of the common interest community within the knowledge of the executive board or managing entity.

The remaining term of any leasehold estate affecting the common interest community and the provisions governing any extension or renewal of it.

Any restrictions in the declaration affecting the amount that may be received by a unit owner upon sale, condemnation, casualty loss to the unit or the common interest community, or termination of the common interest community.

The association, within 10 days after a request by a unit owner, shall furnish to the unit owner a certificate containing the information necessary to enable the unit owner to comply with this section. A unit owner providing a certificate pursuant to subsection (a) of this section is not liable to the purchaser for any erroneous information provided by the association and included in the certificate.

A purchaser is not liable for any unpaid assessment or fee greater than the amount set forth in the certificate prepared by the association. A unit owner is not liable to a purchaser for the failure or delay of the association to provide the certificate in a timely manner, but the purchase contract is voidable by the purchaser until the certificate has been provided and for five days thereafter.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

In the case of the resale of a unit by a private unit owner who is not a declarant or a person in the business of selling real estate for his own account, a public offering statement need not be provided. See Section 4-102(c). Nevertheless, there are important facts which a purchaser should have in order to make a rational judgment about the advisability of purchasing the particular unit. Accordingly, each unit owner not required to furnish a public offering statement under Section 4-102(c) and not exempt under Section 4-101(b) is required to furnish to a resale purchaser, before the execution of any contract of sale, a copy of the declaration, bylaws, and rules and regulations of the association and a variety of fiscal, insurance, and other information concerning the common interest community and the unit.

While the obligation to provide the information required by this section rests upon each unit owner (since the purchaser is in privity only with that unit owner), the association has an obligation to provide the information to the unit owner within 10 days after a request for such information. Under Section 3-102(a)(12), the association is entitled to charge the unit owner a reasonable fee for the preparation of the certificate. Should the association fail to provide the certificate as required, the unit owner would have a right to action against the association pursuant to Section 4-117.

Under subsection (c), if a purchaser receives a resale certificate which fails to state the proper amount of the unpaid assessments due from the purchased unit, the purchaser is not liable for any amount greater than that disclosed in the resale certificate. Because a resale purchaser is dependent upon the association for information with respect to the outstanding assessments against the unit which he contemplates buying, it is altogether appropriate that the association should be prohibited from later collecting greater assessments than those disclosed prior to the time of the resale purchase.

The 1994 revisions to this section track amendments in adopting States which simplified the contents of the resale certificate.

§ 4-110.
Escrow of deposits.

Any deposit made in connection with the purchase or reservation of a unit from a person required to deliver a public offering statement pursuant to subsection 4-102(c) of this title shall be placed in escrow and held either in this state or in the state where the unit is located in an account designated solely for that purpose by a licensed real estate broker, an attorney licensed in that state or a banking institution the accounts of which are insured by an agency or instrumentality of the government until the deposit is:

delivered to the declarant at closing;

delivered to the declarant after the purchaser’s default under a contract to purchase; or

refunded to the purchaser.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This section applies to the sale by persons required to furnish public offering statements of residential units and of non-residential units unless waived pursuant to the provisions of Section 4-101. It does not apply, however, to resales of units between private parties.

This section provides declarant a number of choices as to the appropriate escrow agent. Whether the escrow agent must deposit the funds in an insured institutional depository, or in a particular type of account, depends on state law or the agreement of the parties. To minimize record keeping, of course, the institutional depository could itself be the escrow agent. The section does not require a separate account for each unit, so that mingling of funds in a single escrow account would be permitted. The account may be held either in the State where the unit is located, or in the enacting State, in recognition that buyers are often from outside the State where the unit is located.

The escrow requirements of this section apply in connection with any deposit made by a purchaser, whether such deposit is made pursuant to a binding contract or pursuant to a nonbinding reservation agreement (with respect to which no public offering statement is required under Section 4-101(b)(6)).

In some States current practice permits escrows to be held by certain title insurance or escrow companies, attorneys, or real estate brokers. Accordingly, the bracketed language should be included or deleted in accordance with local practice.

Under this section, any interest earned on an escrow deposit may, but need not, be credited to the purchaser at closing, added to any deposit forfeited to the seller, or added to any deposit refunded to the purchaser. In short, disposition of any interest is left to agreement of the parties.

In some States, such as New York, the substitution of a bond in place of a deposit escrow is permitted. The evidence indicates, however, that in many instances the use of the bonding device has forced purchasers to incur substantial costs and delay prior to obtaining refunds to which they are entitled. For this reason, this Act does not include bonding as an alternative to the required escrow of deposits.

§ 4-111.
Release of liens.

In the case of a sale of a unit where delivery of a public offering statement is required pursuant to subsection 4-102(c) of this title, before conveying a unit, a seller shall:

record or furnish to the purchaser releases of all liens, except liens on real estate that a declarant has the right to withdraw from the common interest community, which the purchaser does not expressly agree to take subject to or assume and which encumber:

in a condominium, that unit and its common element interest; and

in a planned community, that unit and any limited common elements assigned to it; or

provide a surety bond or substitute collateral for or insurance against the lien.

Before conveying real estate to the association, the declarant shall have that real estate released from:

all liens the foreclosure of which would deprive unit owners of any right of access to or easement of support of their units; and

all other liens on that real estate unless the public offering statement describes certain real estate which may be conveyed subject to liens in specified amounts.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

The exemption for withdrawable real estate set forth in subsection (a) is designed to preserve flexibility for the declarant in terms of financing arrangements. It deals with the unusual case in which a unit has been assigned a limited common element (for example, a parking space) on real estate which the developer has the right to withdraw from the common interest community. In that case, the limited common element can be assigned to the unit without release of liens or assumption of them by the unit owner. Theoretically, a developer might partially avoid the lien release requirement of subsection (a) by placing part of the limited common element improvements such as a parking garage on withdrawable real estate. By doing so, it could separately mortgage that part of the limited common elements without being obligated to discharge the mortgage or secure partial releases when individual units to which the limited common elements are assigned are sold.

Subsection (b) will most commonly apply in the case of a planned community, where all of the common elements, whatever they may be in a particular project, must be owned by the association, see Section 1-103(4), or in a cooperative, where Section 2-101 requires that all the real estate comprising the cooperative must be conveyed to the association at the time the cooperative is created. The section would also apply, however, in the event other real estate, such as units or other real property not subject to the declaration, is conveyed to the association.

If a mortgage or other lien created by or arising against the developer attaches to withdrawable real estate after the declaration has been recorded, a lapse of the developer’s right to withdraw the real estate would also terminate the rights of the lienors, since the lien would attach only to the developer’s interest (the right to withdraw).
However, an alert lienor would not permit the right to withdraw to lapse without taking steps to see that the right to withdraw is exercised.
If the mortgage or other lien attached to the real estate and was perfected before the planned community declaration was recorded, lapse of the right to withdraw would not affect the lienor’s rights and it could foreclose on the real estate whether or not the developer had lost the right to withdraw.
As a practical matter, whether the mortgage or other lien against withdrawable real estate arises before or after the declaration is recorded, unit owners may find that, if the association does not release liens on withdrawable real estate containing limited common elements, the lienor will be able to withdraw the land and deprive the unit owners of its use.
Therefore, unit purchasers and their counsel should be alert to that possibility.

§ 4-112.
[Reserved.]

§ 4-113.
Express warranties of quality.

Express warranties made by a declarant to a purchaser of a unit are created as follows:

Any affirmation of fact or promise which relates to the unit, its use or rights appurtenant to it, area improvements to the common interest community that would directly benefit the unit, or the right to use or have the benefit of facilities not located in the common interest community warranties conformity of the unit and related rights and uses.

Any model or description of the physical characteristics of the common interest community, including plans and specifications of or for improvements, creates an express warranty that the common interest community will conform to the model or description, unless the model or description clearly discloses that it is only proposed or is subject to change.

Any description of the quantity or extent of the real estate comprising the common interest community, including plats or surveys warranties conformity of the common interest community to the description, subject to customary tolerances.

A provision that a purchaser may put a unit only to a specified use warranties the legality of the specified use.

Neither formal words, such as “warranty” or “guarantee,” nor a specific intention to make a warranty is necessary to create an express warranty of quality, but a statement purporting to be merely an opinion or commendation of the real estate or its value does not create a warranty.

A conveyance of a unit transfers to the purchaser all express warranties of quality made by the declarant.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999; amended

2009, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 45, eff. Jan. 1, 2012.